Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 5
Miscellaneous Provisions

§ 15-13-501. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

§ 15-13-502. Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

This chapter modifies, limits and supersedes the federal electronic signatures in global and national commerce act, 15 U.S.C. section 7001, et seq., but does not modify, limit or supersede section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. section 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. section 7003(b).

§ 15-13-503. [Reserved.]

§ 15-13-504. Transitional provision.

This chapter applies to guardianship and protective proceedings begun on or after July 1, 2011.

Parts 1, 3 and 4 of this chapter and sections 15-13-501 and 15-13-502, Idaho Code, apply to proceedings begun before July 1, 2011, regardless of whether a guardianship or protective order has been issued.